Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3304
Civil litigation funding company;
prohibited acts.

(1)
The civil litigation funding company shall not pay or offer to pay commissions
or referral fees to any attorney or employee of a law firm or to any medical
provider, chiropractor, or physical therapist or their employees for referring
a consumer to the civil litigation funding company.

(2) The civil
litigation funding company shall not accept any commissions, referral fees,
or rebates from any attorney or employee of a law firm or any medical provider,
chiropractor, or physical therapist or their employees.

(3) The civil
litigation funding company shall not advertise false or intentionally misleading
information regarding such company's product or services.

(4) The civil
litigation funding company shall not knowingly provide nonrecourse civil litigation
funding to a consumer who has previously sold and assigned an amount of such
consumer's potential proceeds from the legal claim to another civil litigation
funding company without first buying out that civil litigation funding company's
entire accrued balance unless otherwise agreed in writing by the civil litigation
funding companies and the consumer.

Laws 2010, LB1094, § 4.